Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 875 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Plug-In Solar
Power Amendments Act".
HB4060 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 876 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. "Electric utility" means any public utility providing retail
electric service subject to the jurisdiction of the Oklahoma
Corporation Commission.
2. "Portable solar generation device" means a solar
photovoltaic device that:
a. has a rated alternating current output capacity of not
more than one thousand two hundred (1,200) watts in
the aggregate,
b. is designed to connect to a customer's premises wiring
through a standard grounded one hundred twenty-volt
electrical outlet,
c. includes integrated anti-islanding or equivalent
safety functionality that prevents energizing a
building's electrical system during a power outage,
and
d. is intended primarily to offset electricity consumed
on the premises of the retail electric customer.
3. "Retail electric customer" means a residential customer
receiving electric service from an electric utility.

HB4060 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 877 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A portable solar generation device that meets the requirements
of this act:
1. Shall not be considered an interconnection under state law
or Oklahoma Corporation Commission rules;
2. Shall not be subject to net metering statutes, tariffs, or
programs; and
3. Shall not require an interconnection agreement, application,
inspection, or approval from an electric utility or the Oklahoma
Corporation Commission.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 878 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
An electric utility shall not require a retail electric customer
using a qualifying portable solar generation device to:
1. Obtain prior authorization or permission from the utility;
2. Pay any fee, charge, or tariff related to the installation
or use of the device;
3. Install additional metering, controls, or equipment beyond
what is integrated into the device;
4. Execute an interconnection, net metering, or service
modification agreement; or
HB4060 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. Purchase insurance or provide indemnification related to the
device.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 879 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A portable solar generation device shall comply with nationally
recognized electrical safety standards, including anti-islanding
protection. Nothing in this act limits the authority of state or
local electrical inspectors to enforce generally applicable
electrical safety codes unrelated to utility interconnection.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 880 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
An electric utility shall not be liable for any damage, injury,
or loss caused by a portable solar generation device or the
installation, operation, or maintenance of such a device by a retail
electric customer. The retail electric customer bears
responsibility for the proper installation and maintenance of the
device and compliance with applicable safety standards.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 881 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Corporation Commission may adopt administrative
rules solely as necessary to:
HB4060 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. Enforce the provisions of this act; and
2. Ensure compliance with applicable safety standards.
B. Rules adopted under this section shall not:
1. Require registration, approval, or notification for portable
solar generation devices;
2. Impose fees or charges;
3. Reduce the maximum wattage authorized by statute; or
4. Subject such devices to net metering or interconnection
requirements.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 882 of Title 17, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Nothing in this act shall be construed to:
1. Authorize compensation for exported electricity;
2. Modify existing distributed generation or net metering
programs; or
3. Limit the authority of the Oklahoma Corporation Commission
over traditional interconnection of electric generation facilities.
SECTION 9. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/04/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.



HB4060 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.